Illinois, session 104th, SB2176.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Animal Control Act is amended by adding 5Section 3.8 as follows: 6    (510 ILCS 5/3.8 new)7    Sec. 3.8. Construction of Act. This Act shall not be 8construed to prevent units of local government from 9apprehending dangerous animals, including dangerous dogs, on a 10street or other public space.